Illinois, session 104th, HB5426.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The School Code is amended by changing Section 510-22.6 and by adding Sections 10-20.88, 27A-5.3, and 634-18.14a as follows: 7    (105 ILCS 5/10-20.88 new)8    Sec. 10-20.88. Wireless communication device policy.9    (a) As used in this Section:10    "School time" means the time during a school day students 11spend on the school campus, including instructional time, 12recess, lunch time, and passing time. "School time" includes a 13student's presence at off-campus learning opportunities.14    "Wireless communication device" means any portable 15wireless device that has the capability to provide voice, 16messaging, or other data communication between 2 or more 17parties, including, but not limited to:18        (1) cellular telephones;19        (2) tablet computers;20        (3) laptop computers;21        (4) gaming devices; and22        (5) wearable devices, including smart watches or smart 23    glasses, except when those devices have the capability to   HB5426- 2 -LRB104 20031 LNS 33482 b1    provide messaging or other data communication disabled.2    "Wireless communication device" does not include any 3device that a school district or teacher has directly issued 4to, provided for, or required a student to possess and use for 5educational purposes.6    (b) On or before the beginning of the 2027-2028 school 7year, each school board shall adopt and implement a wireless 8communication device policy that:9        (1) at a minimum, prohibits a student from using a 10    wireless communication device during school time, except 11    as otherwise provided in subsections (c) and (d);12        (2) incorporates guidance for wireless communication 13    device storage within a school building during school 14    time; and15        (3) requires individual schools in the district to 16    outline reasonable consequences for, at least, the first 3 17    violations of the policy by a student. If the policy 18    includes a consequence that requires parents or guardians 19    to retrieve the wireless communication device at the 20    school building, an alternative shall be provided for 21    cases in which the parents or guardians are unable to 22    appear in person.23    (c) The policy adopted and implemented under subsection 24(b) may not prohibit a student from using a wireless 25communication device during school time under the following 26circumstances:  HB5426- 3 -LRB104 20031 LNS 33482 b1        (1) if a licensed physician, physician assistant, or 2    nurse practitioner determines that the possession or use 3    of a wireless communication device is necessary for the 4    management of the student's health care and the student 5    uses the wireless communication device only as prescribed 6    by the licensed physician, physician assistant, or nurse 7    practitioner;8        (2) to fulfill an individualized education program, a 9    plan developed under Section 504 of the federal 10    Rehabilitation Act of 1973, the student's health care 11    provider's medical orders, or another written 12    accommodation plan;13        (3) if school personnel have determined the wireless 14    communication device is necessary for students who are 15    English learners, as defined in Section 14C-2, to access 16    learning materials;17        (4) if school personnel have determined, on a 18    case-by-case basis, the wireless communication device is 19    necessary for a student caregiver who is routinely 20    responsible for the care and well-being of a family 21    member; or22        (5) as required by any other State or federal law.23    (d) The policy adopted and implemented under subsection 24(b) may allow for the following exceptions:25        (1) at the discretion of the school district, the 26    school district may allow the definition of school time to   HB5426- 4 -LRB104 20031 LNS 33482 b1    exclude a high school student's lunch period;2        (2) if school personnel have authorized the student to 3    use a wireless communication device for educational 4    purposes; and5        (3) in the event of an emergency as detailed in at 6    least one of the school district's emergency and crisis 7    response plans, protocols, or procedures.8    (e) No school district may enforce the wireless 9communication device policy through fees, fines, suspensions, 10expulsions, or the deployment of a school resource officer or 11local law enforcement officer, as long as this limitation on 12suspensions and expulsions does not extend to the use of a 13wireless communication device to engage in other gross 14disobedience or misconduct.15    (f) The development of the policy in subsection (b) shall 16include, at a minimum, input from the local collective 17bargaining agent representing teachers, if any, 18administrators, and parents or guardians. Student input in the 19development of the policy in subsection (b) is encouraged. 20Each school board shall review its wireless communication 21device policy at least once every 3 years and make any 22necessary and appropriate revisions to the policy. During this 23review, each school board shall engage, at a minimum, the 24local collective bargaining agent representing teachers, if 25any, administrators, and parents or guardians for input and 26consider any available data on the enforcement of the wireless   HB5426- 5 -LRB104 20031 LNS 33482 b1communication device policy. The development and review of the 2wireless communication device policy in this subsection may be 3accomplished through the use of the parent-teacher advisory 4committee set forth in Section 10-20.14.5    (g) Before implementation of the policy in subsection (b), 6and with every update to the policy, each school district 7shall ensure all school personnel and substitute teachers are 8informed of the tenets of the policy, the roles and 9responsibilities of staff members, the importance of uniform 10enforcement, and the handling of implementation in a 11trauma-informed, developmentally appropriate manner.12    (h) A school board and any school personnel shall be 13immune from any liability resulting from damage to a wireless 14communication device when the device is stored in good faith 15and in accordance with the school board's wireless 16communication device policy. This subsection shall not apply 17if the damage to the wireless communication device is caused 18by the willful and wanton conduct of school personnel.19    (i) The wireless communication device policy shall be 20posted on the school district's existing, publicly accessible 21Internet website and included in the student handbook. The 22wireless communication device policy shall be provided 23annually to parents, guardians, and school personnel, 24including new employees when hired. Provision of a hyperlink 25to the policy shall satisfy the requirements of this 26subsection.  HB5426- 6 -LRB104 20031 LNS 33482 b1    (j) By September 1, 2026 the State Board of Education 2shall post on its website a template for a model wireless 3communication device policy.4    (k) If a school district has an existing wireless 5communication device policy in place before the effective date 6of this amendatory Act of the 104th General Assembly that 7limits wireless communication devices during a majority of or 8the entirety of the school day, the district may keep its 9existing policy in place until the 2030-2031 school year, at 10which point the district must adopt a wireless communication 11device policy meeting the requirements of the policy described 12in subsection (b).  13    (105 ILCS 5/10-22.6)  (from Ch. 122, par. 10-22.6)14    Sec. 10-22.6. Suspension or expulsion of students; school 15searches. 16    (a) To expel students guilty of gross disobedience or 17misconduct, including gross disobedience or misconduct 18perpetuated by electronic means, pursuant to subsection (b-20) 19of this Section, and no action shall lie against them for such 20expulsion. Expulsion shall take place only after the parents 21or guardians have been requested to appear at a meeting of the 22board, or with a hearing officer appointed by it, to discuss 23their child's behavior. Such request shall be made by 24registered or certified mail and shall state the time, place 25and purpose of the meeting. The board, or a hearing officer   HB5426- 7 -LRB104 20031 LNS 33482 b1appointed by it, at such meeting shall state the reasons for 2dismissal and the date on which the expulsion is to become 3effective. If a hearing officer is appointed by the board, the 4hearing officer shall report to the board a written summary of 5the evidence heard at the meeting and the board may take such 6action thereon as it finds appropriate. If the board acts to 7expel a student, the written expulsion decision shall detail 8the specific reasons why removing the student from the 9learning environment is in the best interest of the school. 10The expulsion decision shall also include a rationale as to 11the specific duration of the expulsion. An expelled student 12may be immediately transferred to an alternative program in 13the manner provided in Article 13A or 13B of this Code. A 14student must not be denied transfer because of the expulsion, 15except in cases in which such transfer is deemed to cause a 16threat to the safety of students or staff in the alternative 17program. 18    (b) To suspend or by policy to authorize the 19superintendent of the district or the principal, assistant 20principal, or dean of students of any school to suspend 21students guilty of gross disobedience or misconduct, or to 22suspend students guilty of gross disobedience or misconduct on 23the school bus from riding the school bus, pursuant to 24subsections (b-15) and (b-20) of this Section, and no action 25shall lie against them for such suspension. The board may by 26policy authorize the superintendent of the district or the   HB5426- 8 -LRB104 20031 LNS 33482 b1principal, assistant principal, or dean of students of any 2school to suspend students guilty of such acts for a period not 3to exceed 10 school days. If a student is suspended due to 4gross disobedience or misconduct on a school bus, the board 5may suspend the student in excess of 10 school days for safety 6reasons. 7    Any suspension shall be reported immediately to the 8parents or guardians of a student along with a full statement 9of the reasons for such suspension and a notice of their right 10to a review. The school board must be given a summary of the 11notice, including the reason for the suspension and the 12suspension length. Upon request of the parents or guardians, 13the school board or a hearing officer appointed by it shall 14review such action of the superintendent or principal, 15assistant principal, or dean of students. At such review, the 16parents or guardians of the student may appear and discuss the 17suspension with the board or its hearing officer. If a hearing 18officer is appointed by the board, he shall report to the board 19a written summary of the evidence heard at the meeting. After 20its hearing or upon receipt of the written report of its 21hearing officer, the board may take such action as it finds 22appropriate. If a student is suspended pursuant to this 23subsection (b), the board shall, in the written suspension 24decision, detail the specific act of gross disobedience or 25misconduct resulting in the decision to suspend. The 26suspension decision shall also include a rationale as to the   HB5426- 9 -LRB104 20031 LNS 33482 b1specific duration of the suspension.2    (b-5) Among the many possible disciplinary interventions 3and consequences available to school officials, school 4exclusions, such as out-of-school suspensions and expulsions, 5are the most serious. Out-of-school suspension and expulsion 6may not be used if the sole grounds for the out-of-school 7suspension or expulsion is that the student accessed a 8wireless communication device in violation of the policy 9adopted and implemented pursuant to Section 10-20.88, as long 10as this limitation on out-of-school suspension and expulsion 11does not extend to the use of a wireless communication device 12to engage in other gross disobedience or misconduct. School 13officials shall limit the number and duration of expulsions 14and suspensions to the greatest extent practicable, and it is 15recommended that they use them only for legitimate educational 16purposes. To ensure that students are not excluded from school 17unnecessarily, it is recommended that school officials 18consider forms of non-exclusionary discipline prior to using 19out-of-school suspensions or expulsions. 20    (b-10) Unless otherwise required by federal law or this 21Code, school boards may not institute zero-tolerance policies 22by which school administrators are required to suspend or 23expel students for particular behaviors.24    (b-15) Out-of-school suspensions of 3 days or less may be 25used only if the student's continuing presence in school would 26pose a threat to school safety or a disruption to other   HB5426- 10 -LRB104 20031 LNS 33482 b1students' learning opportunities. For purposes of this 2subsection (b-15), "threat to school safety or a disruption to 3other students' learning opportunities" shall be determined on 4a case-by-case basis by the school board or its designee. 5School officials shall make all reasonable efforts to resolve 6such threats, address such disruptions, and minimize the 7length of suspensions to the greatest extent practicable.8    (b-20) Unless otherwise required by this Code, 9out-of-school suspensions of longer than 3 days, expulsions, 10and disciplinary removals to alternative schools may be used 11only if other appropriate and available behavioral and 12disciplinary interventions have been exhausted and the 13student's continuing presence in school would either (i) pose 14a threat to the safety of other students, staff, or members of 15the school community or (ii) substantially disrupt, impede, or 16interfere with the operation of the school. For purposes of 17this subsection (b-20), "threat to the safety of other 18students, staff, or members of the school community" and 19"substantially disrupt, impede, or interfere with the 20operation of the school" shall be determined on a case-by-case 21basis by school officials. For purposes of this subsection 22(b-20), the determination of whether "appropriate and 23available behavioral and disciplinary interventions have been 24exhausted" shall be made by school officials. School officials 25shall make all reasonable efforts to resolve such threats, 26address such disruptions, and minimize the length of student   HB5426- 11 -LRB104 20031 LNS 33482 b1exclusions to the greatest extent practicable. Within the 2suspension decision described in subsection (b) of this 3Section or the expulsion decision described in subsection (a) 4of this Section, it shall be documented whether other 5interventions were attempted or whether it was determined that 6there were no other appropriate and available interventions.7    (b-25) Students who are suspended out-of-school for longer 8than 3 school days shall be provided appropriate and available 9support services during the period of their suspension. For 10purposes of this subsection (b-25), "appropriate and available 11support services" shall be determined by school authorities. 12Within the suspension decision described in subsection (b) of 13this Section, it shall be documented whether such services are 14to be provided or whether it was determined that there are no 15such appropriate and available services. 16    A school district may refer students who are expelled to 17appropriate and available support services.18    A school district shall create a policy to facilitate the 19re-engagement of students who are suspended out-of-school, 20expelled, or returning from an alternative school setting. In 21consultation with stakeholders deemed appropriate by the State 22Board of Education, the State Board of Education shall draft 23and publish guidance for the re-engagement of students who are 24suspended out-of-school, expelled, or returning from an 25alternative school setting in accordance with this Section and 26Section 13A-4 on or before July 1, 2025.   HB5426- 12 -LRB104 20031 LNS 33482 b1    (b-30) A school district shall create a policy by which 2suspended students, including those students suspended from 3the school bus who do not have alternate transportation to 4school, shall have the opportunity to make up work for 5equivalent academic credit. It shall be the responsibility of 6a student's parents or guardians to notify school officials 7that a student suspended from the school bus does not have 8alternate transportation to school. 9    (b-35) In all suspension review hearings conducted under 10subsection (b) or expulsion hearings conducted under 11subsection (a), a student may disclose any factor to be 12considered in mitigation, including his or her status as a 13parent, expectant parent, or victim of domestic or sexual 14violence, as defined in Article 26A. A representative of the 15parent's or guardian's choice, or of the student's choice if 16emancipated, must be permitted to represent the student 17throughout the proceedings and to address the school board or 18its appointed hearing officer. With the approval of the 19student's parent or guardian, or of the student if 20emancipated, a support person must be permitted to accompany 21the student to any disciplinary hearings or proceedings. The 22representative or support person must comply with any rules of 23the school district's hearing process. If the representative 24or support person violates the rules or engages in behavior or 25advocacy that harasses, abuses, or intimidates either party, a 26witness, or anyone else in attendance at the hearing, the   HB5426- 13 -LRB104 20031 LNS 33482 b1representative or support person may be prohibited from 2further participation in the hearing or proceeding. A 3suspension or expulsion proceeding under this subsection 4(b-35) must be conducted independently from any ongoing 5criminal investigation or proceeding, and an absence of 6pending or possible criminal charges, criminal investigations, 7or proceedings may not be a factor in school disciplinary 8decisions.9    (b-40) During a suspension review hearing conducted under 10subsection (b) or an expulsion hearing conducted under 11subsection (a) that involves allegations of sexual violence by 12the student who is subject to discipline, neither the student 13nor his or her representative shall directly question nor have 14direct contact with the alleged victim. The student who is 15subject to discipline or his or her representative may, at the 16discretion and direction of the school board or its appointed 17hearing officer, suggest questions to be posed by the school 18board or its appointed hearing officer to the alleged victim. 19    (c) A school board must invite a representative from a 20local mental health agency to consult with the board at the 21meeting whenever there is evidence that mental illness may be 22the cause of a student's expulsion or suspension.23    (c-5) School districts shall make reasonable efforts to 24provide ongoing professional development to all school 25personnel, school board members, and school resource officers 26on the requirements of this Section and Section 10-20.14, the   HB5426- 14 -LRB104 20031 LNS 33482 b1adverse consequences of school exclusion and justice-system 2involvement, effective classroom management strategies, 3culturally responsive discipline, trauma-responsive learning 4environments, as defined in subsection (b) of Section 3-11, 5the appropriate and available supportive services for the 6promotion of student attendance and engagement, and 7developmentally appropriate disciplinary methods that promote 8positive and healthy school climates. 9    (d) The board may expel a student for a definite period of 10time not to exceed 2 calendar years, as determined on a 11case-by-case basis. A student who is determined to have 12brought one of the following objects to school, any 13school-sponsored activity or event, or any activity or event 14that bears a reasonable relationship to school shall be 15expelled for a period of not less than one year:16        (1) A firearm. For the purposes of this Section, 17    "firearm" means any gun, rifle, shotgun, weapon as defined 18    by Section 921 of Title 18 of the United States Code, 19    firearm as defined in Section 1.1 of the Firearm Owners 20    Identification Card Act, or firearm as defined in Section 21    24-1 of the Criminal Code of 2012. The expulsion period 22    under this subdivision (1) may be modified by the 23    superintendent, and the superintendent's determination may 24    be modified by the board on a case-by-case basis.25        (2) A knife, brass knuckles or other knuckle weapon 26    regardless of its composition, a billy club, or any other   HB5426- 15 -LRB104 20031 LNS 33482 b1    object if used or attempted to be used to cause bodily 2    harm, including "look alikes" of any firearm as defined in 3    subdivision (1) of this subsection (d). The expulsion 4    requirement under this subdivision (2) may be modified by 5    the superintendent, and the superintendent's determination 6    may be modified by the board on a case-by-case basis. 7Expulsion or suspension shall be construed in a manner 8consistent with the federal Individuals with Disabilities 9Education Act. A student who is subject to suspension or 10expulsion as provided in this Section may be eligible for a 11transfer to an alternative school program in accordance with 12Article 13A of the School Code.13    (d-5) The board may suspend or by regulation authorize the 14superintendent of the district or the principal, assistant 15principal, or dean of students of any school to suspend a 16student for a period not to exceed 10 school days or may expel 17a student for a definite period of time not to exceed 2 18calendar years, as determined on a case-by-case basis, if (i) 19that student has been determined to have made an explicit 20threat on an Internet website against a school employee, a 21student, or any school-related personnel, (ii) the Internet 22website through which the threat was made is a site that was 23accessible within the school at the time the threat was made or 24was available to third parties who worked or studied within 25the school grounds at the time the threat was made, and (iii) 26the threat could be reasonably interpreted as threatening to   HB5426- 16 -LRB104 20031 LNS 33482 b1the safety and security of the threatened individual because 2of the individual's duties or employment status or status as a 3student inside the school. 4    (e) To maintain order and security in the schools, school 5authorities may inspect and search places and areas such as 6lockers, desks, parking lots, and other school property and 7equipment owned or controlled by the school, as well as 8personal effects left in those places and areas by students, 9without notice to or the consent of the student, and without a 10search warrant. As a matter of public policy, the General 11Assembly finds that students have no reasonable expectation of 12privacy in these places and areas or in their personal effects 13left in these places and areas. School authorities may request 14the assistance of law enforcement officials for the purpose of 15conducting inspections and searches of lockers, desks, parking 16lots, and other school property and equipment owned or 17controlled by the school for illegal drugs, weapons, or other 18illegal or dangerous substances or materials, including 19searches conducted through the use of specially trained dogs. 20If a search conducted in accordance with this Section produces 21evidence that the student has violated or is violating either 22the law, local ordinance, or the school's policies or rules, 23such evidence may be seized by school authorities, and 24disciplinary action may be taken. School authorities may also 25turn over such evidence to law enforcement authorities.26    (f) Suspension or expulsion may include suspension or   HB5426- 17 -LRB104 20031 LNS 33482 b1expulsion from school and all school activities and a 2prohibition from being present on school grounds.3    (g) A school district may adopt a policy providing that if 4a student is suspended or expelled for any reason from any 5public or private school in this or any other state, the 6student must complete the entire term of the suspension or 7expulsion in an alternative school program under Article 13A 8of this Code or an alternative learning opportunities program 9under Article 13B of this Code before being admitted into the 10school district if there is no threat to the safety of students 11or staff in the alternative program. A school district that 12adopts a policy under this subsection (g) must include a 13provision allowing for consideration of any mitigating 14factors, including, but not limited to, a student's status as 15a parent, expectant parent, or victim of domestic or sexual 16violence, as defined in Article 26A. 17    (h) School officials shall not advise or encourage 18students to drop out voluntarily due to behavioral or academic 19difficulties.20    (i) In this subsection (i), "municipal code violation" 21means the violation of a rule or regulation established by a 22local government authority, authorized by Section 1-2-1 of the 23Illinois Municipal Code.24    A student must not be issued a monetary fine, fee, ticket, 25or citation as a school-based disciplinary consequence or for 26a municipal code violation or a violation of the policy   HB5426- 18 -LRB104 20031 LNS 33482 b1adopted and implemented pursuant to Section 10-20.88 on school 2grounds during school hours or while taking school 3transportation by any person, though this shall not preclude 4requiring a student to provide restitution for lost, stolen, 5or damaged property.6    This subsection (i) does not modify school disciplinary 7responses under this Section or Section 10-20.14 of this Code 8that existed before the effective date of this amendatory Act 9of the 104th General Assembly or responses to alleged 10delinquent or criminal conduct set forth in this Code, Article 11V of the Juvenile Court Act of 1987, or the Criminal Code of 122012. This subsection (i) does not apply to violations of 13traffic, boating, or fish and game laws. 14    (j) Subsections (a) through (i) of this Section shall 15apply to elementary and secondary schools, charter schools, 16special charter districts, and school districts organized 17under Article 34 of this Code. 18    (k) Through June 30, 2026, the expulsion of students 19enrolled in programs funded under Section 1C-2 of this Code is 20subject to the requirements under paragraph (7) of subsection 21(a) of Section 2-3.71 of this Code.22    (k-5) On and after July 1, 2026, the expulsion of children 23enrolled in programs funded under Section 15-25 of the 24Department of Early Childhood Act is subject to the 25requirements of paragraph (7) of subsection (a) of Section 2615-30 of the Department of Early Childhood Act.   HB5426- 19 -LRB104 20031 LNS 33482 b1    (l) An in-school suspension program provided by a school 2district for any students in kindergarten through grade 12 may 3focus on promoting non-violent conflict resolution and 4positive interaction with other students and school personnel. 5A school district may employ a school social worker or a 6licensed mental health professional to oversee an in-school 7suspension program in kindergarten through grade 12.8(Source: P.A. 103-594, eff. 6-25-24; 103-896, eff. 8-9-24; 9104-417, eff. 8-15-25; 104-430, eff. 8-20-25.) 10    (105 ILCS 5/27A-5.3 new)11    Sec. 27A-5.3. Wireless communication device policy.12    (a) As used in this Section:13    "School time" means the time during a school day students 14spend on the school campus, including instructional time, 15recess, lunch time, and passing time. "School time" includes a 16student's presence at off-campus learning opportunities.17    "Wireless communication device" means any portable 18wireless device that has the capability to provide voice, 19messaging, or other data communication between 2 or more 20parties, including, but not limited to:21        (1) cellular telephones;22        (2) tablet computers;23        (3) laptop computers;24        (4) gaming devices; and25        (5) wearable devices, including smart watches or smart   HB5426- 20 -LRB104 20031 LNS 33482 b1    glasses, except when those devices have the capability to 2    provide messaging or other data communication disabled.3    "Wireless communication device" does not include any 4device that a school district or teacher has directly issued 5to, provided for, or required a student to possess and use for 6educational purposes.7    (b) On or before the beginning of the 2027-2028 school 8year, each charter school shall adopt and implement a wireless 9communication device policy that:10        (1) at a minimum, prohibits a student from using a 11    wireless communication device during school time, except 12    as otherwise provided in subsections (c) and (d);13        (2) incorporates guidance for wireless communication 14    device storage within a school building during school 15    time; and16        (3) outlines reasonable consequences for, at least, 17    the first 3 violations of the policy by a student. If the 18    policy includes a consequence that requires parents or 19    guardians to retrieve the wireless communication device at 20    the school building, an alternative shall be provided for 21    cases in which the parents or guardians are unable to 22    appear in person.23    (c) The policy adopted and implemented under subsection 24(b) may not prohibit a student from using a wireless 25communication device during school time under the following 26circumstances:  HB5426- 21 -LRB104 20031 LNS 33482 b1        (1) if a licensed physician, physician assistant, or 2    nurse practitioner determines that the possession or use 3    of a wireless communication device is necessary for the 4    management of the student's health care and the student 5    uses the wireless communication device only as prescribed 6    by the licensed physician, physician assistant, or nurse 7    practitioner;8        (2) to fulfill an individualized education program, a 9    plan developed under Section 504 of the federal 10    Rehabilitation Act of 1973, the student's health care 11    provider's medical orders, or another written 12    accommodation plan;13        (3) if school personnel have determined the wireless 14    communication device is necessary for students who are 15    English learners, as defined in Section 14C-2, to access 16    learning materials;17        (4) if school personnel have determined, on a 18    case-by-case basis, the wireless communication device is 19    necessary for a student caregiver who is routinely 20    responsible for the care and well-being of a family 21    member; or22        (5) as required by any other State or federal law.23    (d) The policy adopted and implemented under subsection 24(b) may allow for the following exceptions:25        (1) at the discretion of the charter school, the 26    charter school may allow the definition of school time to   HB5426- 22 -LRB104 20031 LNS 33482 b1    exclude a high school student's lunch period;2        (2) if school personnel have authorized the student to 3    use a wireless communication device for educational 4    purposes; and5        (3) in the event of an emergency as detailed in at 6    least one of the charter school's emergency and crisis 7    response plans, protocols, or procedures.8    (e) No charter school may enforce the wireless 9communication device policy through fees, fines, suspensions, 10expulsions, or the deployment of a school resource officer or 11local law enforcement officer, as long as this limitation on 12suspensions and expulsions does not extend to the use of a 13wireless communication device to engage in other gross 14disobedience or misconduct.15    (f) The development of the policy in subsection (b) shall 16include, at a minimum, input from the local collective 17bargaining agent representing teachers, if any, 18administrators, and parents or guardians. Student input in the 19development of the policy in subsection (b) is encouraged. 20Each charter school shall review its wireless communication 21device policy at least once every 3 years and make any 22necessary and appropriate revisions to the policy. During this 23review, each charter school shall engage, at a minimum, the 24local collective bargaining agent representing teachers, if 25any, administrators, and parents or guardians for input and 26consider any available data on the enforcement of the wireless   HB5426- 23 -LRB104 20031 LNS 33482 b1communication device policy.2    (g) Before implementation of the policy in subsection (b), 3and with every update to the policy, each charter school shall 4ensure all school personnel and substitute teachers are 5informed of the tenets of the policy, the roles and 6responsibilities of staff members, the importance of uniform 7enforcement, and the handling of implementation in a 8trauma-informed, developmentally appropriate manner.9    (h) Any school personnel shall be immune from any 10liability resulting from damage to a wireless communication 11device when the device is stored in good faith and in 12accordance with the charter school's wireless communication 13device policy. This subsection shall not apply if the damage 14to the wireless communication device is caused by the willful 15and wanton conduct of school personnel.16    (i) The wireless communication device policy shall be 17posted on the charter school's existing, publicly accessible 18Internet website and included in the student handbook. The 19wireless communication device policy shall be provided 20annually to parents, guardians, and school personnel, 21including new employees when hired. Provision of a hyperlink 22to the policy shall satisfy the requirements of this 23subsection.24    (j) If a charter school has an existing wireless 25communication device policy in place before the effective date 26of this amendatory Act of the 104th General Assembly that   HB5426- 24 -LRB104 20031 LNS 33482 b1limits wireless communication devices during a majority of or 2the entirety of the school day, the charter school may keep its 3existing policy in place until the 2030-2031 school year, at 4which point the charter school must adopt a wireless 5communication device policy meeting the requirements of the 6policy described in subsection (b).  7    (105 ILCS 5/34-18.14a new)8    Sec. 34-18.14a. Wireless communication device policy.9    (a) As used in this Section:10    "School time" means the time during a school day students 11spend on the school campus, including instructional time, 12recess, lunch time, and passing time. "School time" includes a 13student's presence at off-campus learning opportunities.14    "Wireless communication device" means any portable 15wireless device that has the capability to provide voice, 16messaging, or other data communication between 2 or more 17parties, including, but not limited to:18        (1) cellular telephones;19        (2) tablet computers;20        (3) laptop computers;21        (4) gaming devices; and22        (5) wearable devices, including smart watches or smart 23    glasses, except when those devices have the capability to 24    provide messaging or other data communication disabled.25    "Wireless communication device" does not include any   HB5426- 25 -LRB104 20031 LNS 33482 b1device that a school district or teacher has directly issued 2to, provided for, or required a student to possess and use for 3educational purposes.4    (b) On or before the beginning of the 2027-2028 school 5year, the board shall adopt and implement a wireless 6communication device policy that:7        (1) at a minimum, prohibits a student from using a 8    wireless communication device during school time, except 9    as otherwise provided in subsections (c) and (d);10        (2) incorporates guidance for wireless communication 11    device storage within a school building during school 12    time; and13        (3) requires individual schools in the district to 14    outline reasonable consequences for, at least, the first 3 15    violations of the policy by a student. If the policy 16    includes a consequence that requires parents or guardians 17    to retrieve the wireless communication device at the 18    school building, an alternative shall be provided for 19    cases in which the parents or guardians are unable to 20    appear in person.21    (c) The policy adopted and implemented under subsection 22(b) may not prohibit a student from using a wireless 23communication device during school time under the following 24circumstances:25        (1) if a licensed physician, physician assistant, or 26    nurse practitioner determines that the possession or use   HB5426- 26 -LRB104 20031 LNS 33482 b1    of a wireless communication device is necessary for the 2    management of the student's health care and the student 3    uses the wireless communication device only as prescribed 4    by the licensed physician, physician assistant, or nurse 5    practitioner;6        (2) to fulfill an individualized education program, a 7    plan developed under Section 504 of the federal 8    Rehabilitation Act of 1973, the student's health care 9    provider's medical orders, or another written 10    accommodation plan;11        (3) if school personnel have determined the wireless 12    communication device is necessary for students who are 13    English learners, as defined in Section 14C-2, to access 14    learning materials;15        (4) if school personnel have determined, on a 16    case-by-case basis, the wireless communication device is 17    necessary for a student caregiver who is routinely 18    responsible for the care and well-being of a family 19    member; or20        (5) as required by any other State or federal law.21    (d) The policy adopted and implemented under subsection 22(b) may allow for the following exceptions:23        (1) at the discretion of the school district, the 24    school district may allow the definition of school time to 25    exclude a high school student's lunch period;26        (2) if school personnel have authorized the student to   HB5426- 27 -LRB104 20031 LNS 33482 b1    use a wireless communication device for educational 2    purposes; and3        (3) in the event of an emergency as detailed in at 4    least one of the school district's emergency and crisis 5    response plans, protocols, or procedures.6    (e) The school district may not enforce the wireless 7communication device policy through fees, fines, suspensions, 8expulsions, or the deployment of a school resource officer or 9local law enforcement officer, as long as this limitation on 10suspensions and expulsions does not extend to the use of a 11wireless communication device to engage in other gross 12disobedience or misconduct.13    (f) The development of the policy in subsection (b) shall 14include, at a minimum, input from the local collective 15bargaining agent representing teachers, if any, 16administrators, and parents or guardians. Student input in the 17development of the policy in subsection (b) is encouraged. The 18board shall review its wireless communication device policy at 19least once every 3 years and make any necessary and 20appropriate revisions to the policy. During this review, The 21board shall engage, at a minimum, the local collective 22bargaining agent representing teachers, if any, 23administrators, and parents or guardians for input and 24consider any available data on the enforcement of the wireless 25communication device policy.26    (g) Before implementation of the policy in subsection (b),   HB5426- 28 -LRB104 20031 LNS 33482 b1and with every update to the policy, the school district shall 2ensure all school personnel and substitute teachers are 3informed of the tenets of the policy, the roles and 4responsibilities of staff members, the importance of uniform 5enforcement, and the handling of implementation in a 6trauma-informed, developmentally appropriate manner.7    (h) The board and any school personnel shall be immune 8from any liability resulting from damage to a wireless 9communication device when the device is stored in good faith 10and in accordance with the board's wireless communication 11device policy. This subsection shall not apply if the damage 12to the wireless communication device is caused by the willful 13and wanton conduct of school personnel.14    (i) The wireless communication device policy shall be 15posted on the school district's existing, publicly accessible 16Internet website and included in the student handbook. The 17wireless communication device policy shall be provided 18annually to parents, guardians, and school personnel, 19including new employees when hired. Provision of a hyperlink 20to the policy shall satisfy the requirements of this 21subsection.22    (j) If the school district has an existing wireless 23communication device policy in place before the effective date 24of this amendatory Act of the 104th General Assembly that 25limits wireless communication devices during a majority of or 26the entirety of the school day, the district may keep its   HB5426- 29 -LRB104 20031 LNS 33482 b1existing policy in place until the 2030-2031 school year, at 2which point the district must adopt a wireless communication 3device policy meeting the requirements of the policy described 4in subsection (b).  5    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 6becoming law.